Utah statutes.
61-2b-16.   Certification and licensing examinations.
(1) An original certification or license may only be issued to a person who is
of good moral character and has demonstrated through a written examination
process that he possesses:
(a)  knowledge of technical terms commonly used in or related to real estate
appraising, appraisal report writing, and economic concepts applicable to real
estate;
(b)  an understanding of the basic principles of land economics, the basic
principles of the real estate appraisal process, and the problems likely to be
encountered in gathering, interpreting, and processing the data that is
required in the real estate appraisal process;
(c)  an understanding of the standards for the development and communication
of real estate appraisals as provided in this chapter;
(d)  an understanding of the ethical rules that a real estate appraiser is
required to observe;
(e)  knowledge of theories of depreciation, cost estimating, methods of
capitalization, and the mathematics of real estate appraisal that are
appropriate for the classification of certification or licensure for which the
applicant has applied;
(f)  knowledge of other principles and procedures appropriate for the
classification of certification or licensure for which the applicant has
applied;
(g)  an understanding of basic real estate law; and
(h)  an understanding of the types of misconduct for which disciplinary
proceedings may be initiated against a person certified or licensed under this
chapter.
(2)  The board shall require and pass upon proof necessary to determine the
honesty, competency, integrity, and truthfulness of each applicant.
